nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Bouw > Verkeerskegels en -pionnen: Verkeerspionnen; Verkeerskegels
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Construção > Cones e barreiras de trânsito: Barreiras de trânsito; Cones de trânsito
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Xây dựng > Cọc tiêu và thùng giao thông: Cọc tiêu giao thông hình trụ; Cọc tiêu giao thông hình nón
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Construção > Cones e barris de trânsito: Barris de trânsito; Cones de trânsito
da: Erhverv og industri > Byggeri > Trafikkegler og -tønder: Trafiktønder; Trafikkegler
es: Economía e industria > Construcción > Conos y balizas de tráfico: Balizas de tráfico; Conos de tráfico
nb: Forretninger og industri > Byggevarer > Trafikkjegler og -tønner: Trafikktønner; Trafikkjegler
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 建築 > ロードコーン: トラフィックバレル; トラフィックコーン
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Statyba > Eismo kūgiai ir stulpeliai: Eismo stulpeliai; Eismo kūgiai
sv: Företag och industri > Konstruktion > Trafikkoner och trafiktunnor: Trafiktunnor; Trafikkoner
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Izgradnja > Prometni čunjevi i bačve: Prometne bačve; Prometni čunjevi
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Строителство > Пътни конуси и варели: Варели за трафик; Конуси
tr: İş ve Endüstri > İnşaat > Trafik Konileri ve Silindirleri: Trafik Varilleri; Trafik Konileri
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Construcții > Conuri și balize de circulație: Balize de circulație; Conuri de circulație
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 營造建設 > 交通路錐/路障: 交通路障; 交通路錐
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Construction > Cônes de signalisation: Barils de signalisation; Cône de signalisation
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 건설 > 원뿔형/드럼형 도로 표지: 드럼형 도로 표지; 원뿔형 도로 표지
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Κατασκευές > Κώνοι & βαρέλια σήμανσης κυκλοφορίας: Βαρέλια σήμανσης κυκλοφορίας; Κώνοι σήμανσης κυκλοφορίας
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Stavebníctvo > Dopravné kužele a stĺpiky: Dopravné stĺpiky; Dopravné kužele
en: Business & Industrial > Construction > Traffic Cones & Barrels: Traffic Barrels; Traffic Cones
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Rakennustyöt > Liikennekartiot ja esteet: Liikenne-esteet; Liikennekartiot
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Baugewerbe > Verkehrskegel & -fässer: Verkehrsfässer; Verkehrskegel
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Építés > Forgalmi bóják és hordók: Forgalmi hordók; Forgalmi bóják
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การก่อสร้าง > กรวยและแผงกั้นบนถนน: แผงกั้นจราจร; กรวยจราจร
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Gradbeništvo > Prometni stožci in sodi: Prometni sodi; Prometni stožci
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Строительство > Дорожные конусы и буферы: Дорожные буферы; Дорожные конусы
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Budownictwo > Słupki i barierki drogowe: Barierki drogowe; Słupki drogowe
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Stavebnictví > Dopravní kužely a směrové desky: Dopravní sudy; Dopravní barely
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 建筑用品 > 锥形和桶形交通路标: 交通桶; 交通锥
it: Commercio e industria > Costruzione > Coni stradali: Coni per il traffico; Coni per strada